Utah statutes.
76-5-504.   Victim notification and counseling.
(1)  The Department of Health shall provide the victim who requests testing of
the convicted sexual offender's human immunodeficiency virus status counseling
regarding HIV disease and referral for appropriate health care and support
services.  If the local health department where the victim resides and the
Department of Health agree, the Department of Health shall forward a report of
the convicted sexual offender's human immunodeficiency virus status to the
local health department and the local health department shall provide the
victim who requests the test with the test results, counseling regarding HIV
disease, and referral for appropriate health care and support services.
(2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 26-6-27, the Department of
Health and a local health department acting pursuant to an agreement made
under Subsection (1) may disclose to the victim the results of the convicted
sexual offender's human immunodeficiency virus status as provided in this
section.
